de: Typ des Nabenmotors: Nabenmotor mit Bürsten; Bürstenloser Direktläufer-Nabenmotor; Bürstenloser Getriebe-Nabenmotor; Direktläufer-Nabenmotor; Getriebe-Nabenmotor; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 花鼓电机类型: 有刷轮毂电机; 无刷直驱轮毂电机; 无刷减速轮毂电机; 直驱轮毂电机; 减速轮毂电机; 其他
tr: Göbek motoru tipi: Fırçalı göbek motoru; Fırçasız doğrudan tahrikli göbek motoru; Fırçasız dişli göbek motoru; Doğrudan tahrikli göbek motoru; Dişli göbek motoru; Diğer
th: มอเตอร์ดุมล้อ: มอเตอร์ดุมล้อแบบมีแปรงถ่าน; มอเตอร์ดุมล้อขับตรงแบบไร้แปรงถ่าน; มอเตอร์ดุมล้อแบบมีเกียร์ไร้แปรงถ่าน; มอเตอร์ดุมล้อขับตรง; มอเตอร์ดุมล้อแบบมีเกียร์; อื่นๆ
sv: Navmotortyp: Borstad navmotor; Borstlös direktdriven navmotor; Borstlös växlad navmotor; Direktdriven navmotor; Växlad navmotor; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta motorja v pestu: Krtačni motor v pestu; Brezkrtačni motor z direktnim pogonom v pestu; Brezkrtačni motor z zobniki v pestu; Motor z direktnim pogonom v pestu; Motor z zobniki v pestu; Drugo
el: Τύπος κινητήρα πλήμνης: Κινητήρας πλήμνης με ψήκτρες; Κινητήρας πλήμνης άμεσης μετάδοσης χωρίς ψήκτρες; Κινητήρας πλήμνης με γρανάζια χωρίς ψήκτρες; Κινητήρας πλήμνης άμεσης μετάδοσης; Κινητήρας πλήμνης με γρανάζια; Άλλο
fr: Type de moteur de moyeu: Moteur moyeu à balais; Moteur moyeu à entraînement direct sans balais; Moteur moyeu réducté sans balais; Moteur moyeu à entraînement direct; Moteur moyeu avec réducteur; Autre
da: Type af navmotor: Navmotor med børster; Børsteløs navmotor med direkte drev; Børsteløs navmotor med gear; Navmotor med direkte drev; Navmotor med gear; Andet
cs: Typ motoru v náboji: Kartáčový motor v náboji; Bezkartáčový motor s přímým pohonem; Bezkartáčový převodový motor; Motor v náboji s přímým pohonem; Převodový motor v náboji; Ostatní
fi: Napamoottorin tyyppi: Harjallinen napamoottori; Harjaton suoravetoinen napamoottori; Harjaton vaihteistettu napamoottori; Suoravetoinen napamoottori; Vaihteistettu napamoottori; Muu
nb: Navmotortype: Børstet navmotor; Børsteløs direktedrevet navmotor; Børsteløs giret navmotor; Direktedrevet navmotor; Giret navmotor; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul motorului integrat în butuc: Motor în butuc cu perii; Motor în butuc fără perii cu acționare directă; Motor în butuc fără perii cu reductor; Motor în butuc cu acționare directă; Motor în butuc cu reductor; Altele
hu: Agymotor típusa: Kefés kerékagymotor; Kefe nélküli, közvetlen hajtású kerékagymotor; Kefe nélküli, áttételes kerékagymotor; Közvetlen hajtású kerékagymotor; Áttételes kerékagymotor; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta motora glavčine: Motor u glavčini s četkicama; Motor u glavčini bez četkica s izravnim pogonom; Motor u glavčini bez četkica s prijenosom; Motor u glavčini s izravnim pogonom; Motor u glavčini s prijenosom; Ostalo
ja: ハブモータータイプ: ブラシ付きハブモーター; ブラシレスダイレクトドライブハブモーター; ブラシレスギヤードハブモーター; ダイレクトドライブハブモーター; ギヤードハブモーター; その他
pt-BR: Motor de cubo tipo: Motor de cubo com escovas; Motor de cubo sem escovas de acionamento direto; Motor de cubo com engrenagens sem escovas; Motor de cubo de acionamento direto; Motor de cubo com engrenagens; Outro
ko: 허브 모터 타입: 브러시드 허브 모터; 브러시리스 다이렉트 드라이브 허브 모터; 브러시리스 기어드 허브 모터; 다이렉트 드라이브 허브 모터; 기어드 허브 모터; 기타
sk-SK: Typ motora v náboji: Kartáčový motor v náboji; Bezkartáčový motor s priamym pohonom v náboji; Bezkartáčový prevodový motor v náboji; Motor s priamym pohonom v náboji; Prevodový motor v náboji; Iné
ru: Тип мотор-колеса: Коллекторное мотор-колесо; Бесколлекторное мотор-колесо прямого привода; Бесколлекторное редукторное мотор-колесо; Мотор-колесо прямого привода; Редукторное мотор-колесо; Другое
nl: Naafmotor type: Naafmotor met borstels; Borstelloze direct drive-naafmotor; Borstelloze naafmotor met versnelling; Direct drive-naafmotor; Naafmotor met versnelling; Overig
en: Hub motor type: Brushed hub motor; Brushless direct drive hub motor; Brushless geared hub motor; Direct drive hub motor; Geared hub motor; Other
bg-BG: Тип мотор, разположен в главината на колелото: Четков двигател в главината; Безчетков двигател с директно задвижване в главината; Безчетков редукторен двигател в главината; Двигател с директно задвижване в главината; Редукторен двигател в главината; Друго
es: Tipo de motor de cubo: Motor de buje con escobillas; Motor de buje de transmisión directa sin escobillas; Motor de buje con engranajes sin escobillas; Motor de buje de transmisión directa; Motor de buje con engranajes; Otro
vi: Loại động cơ trục bánh xe: Động cơ đùm có chổi than; Động cơ đùm truyền động trực tiếp không chổi than; Động cơ đùm có hộp số không chổi than; Động cơ đùm truyền động trực tiếp; Động cơ đùm có hộp số; Khác
pl: Typ silnika w piaście: Szczotkowy silnik w piaście; Bezszczotkowy silnik bezprzekładniowy w piaście; Bezszczotkowy silnik przekładniowy w piaście; Silnik bezprzekładniowy w piaście; Silnik przekładniowy w piaście; Inne
pt-PT: tipo de motor de cubo: Motor de cubo com escovas; Motor de cubo de tração direta sem escovas; Motor de cubo com engrenagens sem escovas; Motor de cubo de tração direta; Motor de cubo com engrenagens; Outro
it: Tipo di motore del mozzo: Motore al mozzo a spazzole; Motore al mozzo brushless a presa diretta; Motore al mozzo brushless a ingranaggi; Motore al mozzo a presa diretta; Motore al mozzo a ingranaggi; Altro
lt-LT: Stebulės variklio tipas: Šepetėlinis rato stebulės variklis; Bešepetėlinis tiesioginės pavaros rato stebulės variklis; Bešepetėlinis reduktorinis rato stebulės variklis; Tiesioginės pavaros rato stebulės variklis; Reduktorinis rato stebulės variklis; Kita
zh-TW: 輪轂馬達類型: 有刷輪轂馬達; 無刷直驅輪轂馬達; 無刷齒輪輪轂馬達; 直驅輪轂馬達; 齒輪輪轂馬達; 其他